Utah statutes.
17-8-4.   Joint action of two or more counties.
Whenever the construction of a flood control project, as hereinabove provided,
shall be for the mutual benefit of two or more counties, the boards of
commissioners of counties may jointly enter into such co-operative contracts
with the United States of America, or any agency thereof, for the construction
of such flood control project.
